Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-558
Failure to return license or registration; penalty.

Any person willfully failing to return the license or registration, as required in section 60-556, shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 58, p. 502;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 85.